New York, session 2025-2026, S5830.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 172-g 2 to read as follows: 3 § 172-g. Disclosure of annual employment report for certain non-chari- 4 table, non-profit entities. 1. Any corporation or entity that is quali- 5 fied as an exempt organization or entity by the United States Treasury 6 under I.R.C. 501 (c) (3) and United States Treasury under I.R.C. 501 7 (c) (4) and that receives more than twenty-five percent of its total 8 annual revenue from state funds shall submit an annual employment report 9 to the department of audit and control that includes the name and number 10 of employees employed by such corporation or entity, the number of hours 11 such employees worked, and the annual salary paid to such employees. 12 Annual employment reports shall be submitted electronically in a manner 13 that allows such data to be searchable and transferable to a spreadsheet 14 or database without further manipulation. The reports shall be submitted 15 on a form prescribed by the department of audit and control, and shall 16 be available for public inspection and copying pursuant to section 17 eighty-seven of the public officers law. The department of audit and 18 control shall maintain a searchable database of all electronic forms 19 submitted under this section and such searchable database shall be post- 20 ed on a publicly available website and such searchable database shall 21 include, but need not be limited to, the name of the corporation or 22 entity and the total amount such corporation or entity received from the 23 state, the names and number of employees employed by such corporation or 24 entity, the number of hours such employees worked, and the annual salary 25 paid to such employees. It shall be the responsibility of the office of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04042-01-5 S. 5830 2 1 audit and control to ensure such corporation or entity submits the annu- 2 al report required by this section for each year such corporation or 3 entity receives state funds in excess of twenty-five percent of such 4 corporation's or entity's total annual revenue. 5 2. Corporations or entities that fail to submit the annual employment 6 report required by subdivision one of this section shall be notified 7 immediately by the department of audit and control that such report is 8 due. If such report is not furnished within ninety days after notifica- 9 tion by the department that such report is due, such corporation or 10 entity may be subject to a civil penalty of up to one thousand dollars 11 per month until such report is filed. If the report required by subdivi- 12 sion one of this section is not submitted within one hundred eighty days 13 after notification by the department, the corporation or entity shall be 14 ineligible for additional state funding for a minimum of two years. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 16 it shall have become a law.